Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.500

Nightclubs—Automatic sprinkler system—Building code council shall adopt rules.

(1) The building code council shall adopt rules requiring that all nightclubs be provided with an automatic sprinkler system. Rules adopted by the council shall consider applicable nationally recognized fire and building code standards and local conditions and require that the automatic sprinkler systems be installed by December 1, 2009.

(2) The council shall transmit to the fire protection policy board copies of the rules as adopted. The fire protection policy board shall respond to the council within sixty days after receipt of the rules. If changes are recommended by the fire protection policy board the council shall immediately consider those changes to the rules through its rule-making procedures.

[ 2007 c 434 s 1; 2005 c 148 s 1.]